Massachusetts, session 194th, H5028.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Part I, Title II, Chapter 6, of the Massachusetts General Laws (M.G.L.) Section
15XXXXX: The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart August 10th as Agent
Orange Awareness Day to honor the veterans who were exposed to agent orange during the
Vietnam war, and their families, and recommending that the day be observed in an appropriate
manner by the people.
of 1